de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeuge > Saugglocken: Saugglocken für Waschbecken; Saugglocken für Toilette
pt-BR: Ferragens > Ferramentas > Pistões: Desentupidores de pia; Desentupidores de banheiro
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nářadí a nástroje > Zvony: Zvony na čištění dřezů; Zvony na čištění toalet
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøy > Sugekopper: Vasksugekopper; Toalettsugekopper
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktyg > Avloppsrensare: Vaskrensare; Toalettrensare
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Orodja > Odmaševalniki odtokov: Odmaševalniki za umivalnike; Straniščni odmaševalniki
ro-RO: Feronerie > Unelte > Pompe de desfundat: Pompe de desfundat chiuvete; Pompe de desfundat toalete
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具 > 柱塞: 水槽疏通器; 马桶疏通器
tr: Hırdavat > Aletler > Dalıcı Pistonlar: Lavabo Pistonları; Tuvalet Pistonları
pt-PT: Equipamento > Ferramentas > Desentupidores: Desentupidor de lavatório; Desentupidor de sanita
en: Hardware > Tools > Plungers: Sink Plungers; Toilet Plungers
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankiai > Santechninės pompos: Santechninės pompos kriauklei; Santechninės pompos tualetui
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Utensili > Stura scarichi: Sturalavandini; Stura-WC
ja: DIY用品 > 工具 > ラバーカップ: シンクプランジャー; トイレプランジャー
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具 > 吸把: 水槽柱塞; 馬桶柱塞
hu: Hardver > Szerszámok > Pumpák: Mosogatópumpák; WC-pumpák
vi: Phần cứng > Công cụ > Chốt đẩy: Dụng cụ thông tắc bồn rửa; Dụng cụ thông tắc bồn cầu
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Εργαλεία > Βεντούζες: Βεντούζες απόφραξης νεροχύτη/νιπτήρα; Βεντούζες απόφραξης τουαλέτας
ko: 철물 > 도구 > 플런저: 싱크대 플런저; 변기 플런저
bg-BG: Железария > Инструменти > Вакуум помпи за отпушване: Вакуум помпи за отпушване на мивки; Вакуум помпи за отпушване на тоалетни
hr-HR: Željezarija > Alati > Odčepljivači: Odčepljivači za umivaonik; Odčepljivači za WC
pl: Sprzęt > Narzędzia > Przepychacze: Przepychacze do zlewów; Przepychacze do wc
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Инструменты > Вантузы: Вантузы для раковин; Вантузы для унитазов
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > เครื่องมือ > ลูกสูบ: ที่ปั๊มอ่างล้างมือ; ที่ปั๊มชักโครก
es: Bricolaje > Herramientas > Desatascadores: Desatascadores de fregadero; Desatascadores de inodoro
da: Isenkram > Redskaber > Svuppere: Svuppere til håndvask; Svuppere til toilet
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalut > Viemäripumput: Karhupumput; Viemäripumppu
fr: Quincaillerie > Outils > Ventouses: Déboucheurs d’évier; Déboucheurs de toilettes
sk-SK: Náradie > Nástroje > Inštalatérske zvony: Zvony na umývadlo; Zvony na WC
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschap > Ontstoppers: Gootsteenontstoppers; Toiletontstoppers